Tennessee, session 114, SB2453.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-104(m)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the language "December 31, 2026" and substituting instead the language "December
31, 2040".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-104(m)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "June 30, 2031" and substituting instead the language "June 30, 2041".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2453
010224
- 1 -